Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-1902
Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System; legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) It is within the inherent power of the Legislature to secure needed information in order to legislate, hold hearings, and conduct investigations of matters related to the operation of state government. This power of inquiry is broad and indispensable;

(2) Article IV, section 19, of the Constitution of Nebraska specifically provides that the general management, control, and government of all state reformatory and penal institutions shall be vested as determined by the Legislature;

(3) Article IV, section 23, of the Constitution of Nebraska specifically provides that the Legislature may at any time require that information be provided to it from the officers and employees of state agencies relating to the condition, management, and expenses of their respective offices; and

(4) In order to establish a full-time program of investigation and oversight of the Nebraska correctional system and assist in the development of legislation related to the Nebraska correctional system, the Legislature created the office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System.

Laws 2025, LB298, § 46.